Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 4. Abandonment of Water Rights

§ 41-3-401.
Failure to use water; extension of time; initiation by benefitted or injured user; hearing; appeal.

Where the holder of an appropriation of water from a surface, underground or reservoir water source fails, either intentionally or unintentionally, to use the water therefrom for the beneficial purposes for which it was appropriated, whether under an adjudicated or unadjudicated right, during any five (5) successive years, he is considered as having abandoned the water right and shall forfeit all water rights and privileges appurtenant thereto. Notwithstanding any provision in this section to the contrary, the holder of an appropriation for the diversion and storage of water in a reservoir, from which water or a portion thereof has not yet been beneficially used for the purposes for which appropriated, may apply to the board of control for an extension of time not to exceed five (5) years, within which to use water therefrom for the beneficial purposes for which it was appropriated. In the application the holder shall demonstrate the exercise of due diligence toward the utilization of the appropriation, and that notwithstanding the exercise of due diligence, reasonable cause exists for nonuse. Reasonable cause includes but is not limited to delay due to court or administrative proceedings, time required in planning, developing, financing and constructing projects for the application of stored water to beneficial use which require in excess of five (5) years to complete, delay due to requirement of state and federal statutes and rules and regulations thereunder and any other causes beyond the control of the holder of the appropriation. Upon receipt of an application for extension, the board of control shall proceed under the provisions of W.S.

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

and may grant an extension of time as it finds proper, not to exceed five (5) years, for the application of the appropriated water to the beneficial use for which it was appropriated. A prior grant of extension of time hereunder does not preclude the holder from applying for additional extensions of time, each not to exceed five (5) years, upon similar application and showing. The granting of an extension of time precludes the commencement of an abandonment action against the appropriation during the period of extension.

When any water user who might be benefitted by a declaration of abandonment of existing water rights or who might be injured by the reactivation of the water right, desires to bring about a legal declaration of abandonment, he shall present his case in writing to the state board of control. The board has exclusive original jurisdiction in water right abandonment proceedings. The board shall, if the facts so justify, refer the matter to the superintendent of the water division where the abandonment is claimed to have occurred for public hearing. The total absence of water to divert during an irrigation season precludes the inclusion of any such period of nonuse resulting therefrom in the computation of the successive five (5) year period under this section. The following persons have standing to petition the state board of control to declare the abandonment of existing water rights under this section:

Any person who has a valid adjudicated water right or is the holder of a valid permit from the same source of supply which is equal to or junior in date of priority to the right for which abandonment is sought; or

The holder of a valid water right entitled to surplus water under W.S.

41-4-318

through

41-4-324

, petitioning to abandon a water right from the same source of supply if the right sought to be abandoned has a priority date of March 1, 1945, or earlier.

The superintendent shall notify the holders of water rights sought to be abandoned by certified mail that a hearing will be held. The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to all applicable provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. All notices shall advise interested parties of the time, place and purpose of the hearing. Parties initiating abandonment actions are designated as contestants. Water right holders or other persons with interests in the rights allegedly abandoned are designated as contestees. In any case where notice by certified mail cannot be accomplished an advertisement published once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the abandonment is alleged to have occurred, naming the parties in the case and setting forth the time, place and purpose of the hearing is sufficient. Cost of advertising shall be paid by the contestant.

A transcript shall be made of the hearing and delivered to the superintendent. The contestant shall provide and pay for the costs of the record. At the conclusion of the hearing the transcript, all other evidence and the report of the superintendent shall be transmitted to the board by the superintendent. At its next meeting the board shall vote to declare the right in question abandoned, either wholly or partially, or to decline to do so.

The board shall enter an order reflecting its action on the abandonment hearing, and shall, within sixty (60) days, send a certified copy of the declaration to each contestant and contestee. Appeals may be taken as provided by law.

An appropriation for irrigation use is not subject to partial abandonment for failure of the appropriator to irrigate part of the lands described in his permit or certificate of appropriation during the successive five (5) year period if:

Facilities to divert the water and to apply it to beneficial use upon the lands which were not irrigated existed in usable form during the period of nonuse; and

There was not a sufficient supply of water available, because of regulation for prior water rights or because shortage of supply resulted in insufficient water to satisfy the appropriation in full, to irrigate the lands for which abandonment is sought provided that a diligent effort was made to use the supply which was available.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-47.1; Laws 1977, ch. 100, § 1; ch. 126, § 1; 1985, ch. 203, § 1.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Abandonment not shown. —

Owner's predecessor-in-interest waived any right he had to water under a canal permit when, in order to obtain a ditch enlargement permit, the predecessor submitted an affidavit requesting a canal permit be cancelled; that decision was made final when a ditch enlargement certificate of appropriation was issued in 1922. Abandonment was not shown because there was no formal abandonment or forfeiture procedure, as contemplated by prior and current law. General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River Sys. & All Other Sources v. State, 2015 WY 104, 355 P.3d 1222,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2015).

Purpose of statute. —

Statute providing for forfeiture by nonuser is aimed at the nonuser of the water and not to the nonuse of any particular ditch, canal or reservoir. Van Tassel Real Estate & Livestock Co. v. City of Cheyenne, 49 Wyo. 333, 54 P.2d 906,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(1935), cert. denied, 299 U.S. 574, 57 S. Ct. 38, 81 L. Ed. 423, 1936 U.S. LEXIS 282 (1936) (decided under prior law).

Waters subject to abandonment. —

Waters from sources within the classifications of Wyo. Const., art. 8, § 1 are subject to appropriation and, likewise, abandonment. Bruegman v. Johnson Ranches, Inc., 520 P.2d 489,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1974).

Rights acquired by territorial decree are not vested, but could be lost by abandonment. Wyoming Hereford Ranch v. Hammond Packing Co., 33 Wyo. 14, 236 P. 764,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1925) (decided under prior law).

Supplemental water rights are subject to abandonment.

Hofeldt v. Eyre, 849 P.2d 1295,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1993).

An irrigation district, in challenging a state board of control decision that a portion of the district's water supply had been abandoned, failed to explain how a substantial injustice would befall it if the decision in Mishler v. State Bd. of Medical Examiners, 109 Nev. 287, 849 P.2d 291, 1993 Nev. LEXIS 49, was applied retroactively. Goshen Irrigation Dist. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Control, 926 P.2d 943,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1996).

Subsection (a) amounts to forfeiture by statute

if the facts fit the mandate. It leaves the board and the courts no room to save an appropriator from an abandonment petition where his water has not been used for the beneficial purposes for which it was appropriated for the “five (5) successive years” contemplated by the statute. Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Laramie Rivers Co., 659 P.2d 561,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1983).

Abandonment must be effected by voluntary act

and cannot be accomplished by enforced discontinuance. Horse Creek Conservation Dist. v. Lincoln Land Co., 54 Wyo. 320, 92 P.2d 572,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1939) (decided under prior law).

Provisions of statute that failure to use water appropriated for period of two (now five) years is to be construed as an abandonment applies to a voluntary act, and not to an enforced discontinuance. Morris v. Bean, 146 F. 423, 1906 U.S. App. LEXIS 4115 (D. Mont. 1906), aff'd, 159 F. 651, 1908 U.S. App. LEXIS 4109 (10th Cir. 1908), aff'd, 221 U.S. 485, 31 S. Ct. 703, 55 L. Ed. 821, 1911 U.S. LEXIS 1749 (1911) (decided under prior law).

Forfeitures are not favored in law, and in cases of abandonment, the evidence must be clear and convincing that it was the intent of the owner to abandon. Ramsay v. Gottsche, 51 Wyo. 516, 69 P.2d 535,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1937) (decided under prior law).

A water right cannot be held to be abandoned if nonuse caused by facts beyond user's control. Scherck v. Nichols, 55 Wyo. 4, 95 P.2d 74,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1939) (decided under prior law).

Water right would not be declared abandoned, where holder was forced to discontinue using water because upstream neighbor blocked ditches which would have supplied water to holder's property. Scott v. McTiernan, 974 P.2d 966,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1999), reh'g denied,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. Apr. 27, 1999).

Intent must be shown. —

In order that an initiated inchoate water right may be held to be abandoned, such intention must be shown. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1940), rehearing denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1940) (decided under prior law).

Forfeiture may only be avoided by application of water to beneficial use.

Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Laramie Rivers Co., 659 P.2d 561,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1983).

Undertaking repairs before filing of petition does not prevent forfeiture;

only the use of the water will prevent a forfeiture. Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Laramie Rivers Co., 659 P.2d 561,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1983).

Beneficial use deemed continuing obligation. —

Beneficial use is not a concept which is considered only at the time an appropriation is obtained. The concept represents a continuing obligation which must be satisfied in order for the appropriation to remain viable. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. State Bd. of Control, 578 P.2d 557,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1978).

Continuously irrigated. —

For purposes of a dispute over a state water rights permit, it was determined that this statute provided guidance as to the meaning of “continuously irrigated,” and that the party with the burden of proving continuous irrigation had to provide affirmative proof that the property to be adjudicated was irrigated at least once every five years. State v. Hat Bar Cattle Co. (In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River Sys.), 2015 WY 126, 358 P.3d 1265,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 2015).

Statutory procedure. —

The board and the courts have concurrent jurisdiction over questions of abandonment of water rights, but abandonment proceedings should be initiated before the board. Upon completion of the board's proceedings, the findings, conclusions and order determining the matter, including the record made if a party or the parties desire it, could then be certified by the board to the court. Upon completion of that task, the court would then be enabled to consider and dispose of whatever matters remained for disposal of the litigation. Kearney Lake, Land & Reservoir Co. v. Lake De Smet Reservoir Co., 487 P.2d 324,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1971) (decided under prior law).

Lawful appropriation will not be declared lost in absence of plea of abandonment. —

Wyoming Hereford Ranch v. Hammond Packing Co., 33 Wyo. 14, 236 P. 764,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1925) (decided under prior law).

Burden of proving abandonment. —

The burden of proving abandonment rests upon the contestant. Ramsay v. Gottsche, 51 Wyo. 516, 69 P.2d 535,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1937) (decided under prior law).

Burden of proving water was not available,

excusing nonuse in an abandonment hearing, is on the contestee. In re North Laramie Land Co., 605 P.2d 367,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 1980).

Standing of petitioner. —

Subsection (b) confers standing to a petitioner who alleges and proves three essential facts: (1) That he possesses a valid water right of equal or junior status to the water right sought to be abandoned; (2) that the water right relied upon by the petitioner and the water right for which a declaration of abandonment is sought are from the same source of supply; and (3) that the petitioner stands to benefit from a declaration of abandonment or to sustain injury by reactivation of the contested water right. Schulthess v. Carollo, 832 P.2d 552,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1992).

Plaintiffs lacked standing. —

Evidence was not sufficient to reasonably find that the creek was limited in supply as would have indicated a reasonable likelihood of regulation and, if anything, the evidence indicated more than an adequate supply, and there was not sufficient evidence that the creek experienced historical shortages. Thus, plaintiffs' injury was too speculative to indicate a reasonable likelihood of injury or benefit, and they failed to meet the standing requirements for filing a petition of abandonment. Snider v. Kirchhefer, 2005 WY 71, 115 P.3d 1,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 2005).

Requisite of “tangible” interest. —

This section requires that a petitioner have a “tangible” as opposed to a “theoretical” interest at stake to establish standing, and the petitioner must prove a reasonable likelihood that the abandonment of another person's water rights will either benefit or injure the surplus water right of the petitioner. Schulthess v. Carollo, 832 P.2d 552,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1992); Goshen Irrigation Dist. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Control, 926 P.2d 943,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1996).

Conservation district was not user “who might be affected by declaration of abandonment,”

as it appears that its own rights would not thereby be enlarged. Horse Creek Conservation Dist. v. Lincoln Land Co., 54 Wyo. 320, 92 P.2d 572,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1939) (decided under prior law).

Where there was nonuser of water right for 20 years prior to 1908, while thereafter appropriator used all water available thereunder, conservation district was not entitled, in 1933, to have the water right declared abandoned. Horse Creek Conservation Dist. v. Lincoln Land Co., 54 Wyo. 320, 92 P.2d 572,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1939) (decided under prior law).

Appropriator's rights not “affected” unless injury shown. —

An appropriator's rights are not “affected” for the purpose of bringing abandonment unless he is able to show injury. Cremer v. State Bd. of Control, 675 P.2d 250,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 241

(Wyo. 1984) (decided prior to 1985 amendment).

Injury factor is the jurisdictional requirement

which must be present before one water user may bring an abandonment petition against the water rights of others; the complainant must be able to allege and prove that his water right has been abridged by the use or misuse that the contestee makes of the water in which the contestant has a protective interest. Platte County Grazing Ass'n v. State Bd. of Control, 675 P.2d 1279,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1984) (decided prior to 1985 amendment).

Speculation is an issue

during an application proceeding, pursuant to §

41-4-503

, and during the final stages leading to a certificate of appropriation, pursuant to §

41-4-511

, and it may also be an issue during an abandonment proceeding, pursuant to this section. Denius v. T R Twelve, Inc., 589 P.2d 374,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1979).

Improvement of priority not a “benefit.” —

Improvement of priority is too speculative, uncertain and tenuous to demonstrate a benefit; a relative improvement in priority, standing alone, is not sufficient to show a benefit. Joe Johnson Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Control, 857 P.2d 312,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1993).

“Same source of supply.” —

Nothing in subsection (b) of this section specifically, or in title 41 generally, indicates that the legislature intended that the words “same source of supply” mean “same stream system.” Quite to the contrary, review of title 41 demonstrates that “stream system” and “source of supply” are terms of art employed by the legislature depending upon the result to be achieved. Schulthess v. Carollo, 832 P.2d 552,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1992).

The phrase “same source of supply” in subsection (b) requires that a petitioner for abandonment allege and prove that the respondent's water right, if not from an identical water source, is from a water source which contributes significantly to the water source upon which the petitioner relies to satisfy his appropriation. Schulthess v. Carollo, 832 P.2d 552,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1992).

Junior water-rights holders may contest administration of unquantified stream water. —

The holders of junior water rights in a stream certainly had standing to contest the administration of the stream water that was not quantified by the prior adjudication of the water right. The junior water rights would not have been satisfied, absent some requested relief, due to the lack of water in the stream to satisfy all appropriators. Zezas Ranch v. Board of Control, 714 P.2d 759,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 481

(Wyo. 1986).

No abandonment where senior appropriators consistently diverted full amount of available water. —

Contestants failed to prove an abandonment. The senior appropriators consistently diverted the full amount of water that was available when the flow of water fell below a certain amount, and contacted a water official for administrative regulation. Lewis v. State Bd. of Control, 699 P.2d 822,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 483

(Wyo. 1985).

Contestee's failure to use available water not excused by order limiting water storage. —

The fact that the state engineer had issued an order limiting the contestee's storage of water did not excuse the contestee's failure to fully use the water available under its appropriation and did not constitute a defense under subsection (b) to an action for a declaration of abandonment. Additionally, the board had no obligation to determine the exact volume of water available, but not used, for storage during the years in contest. The only defense to a forfeiture proceeding where nonuse of water is established is proof of the “total” absence of water to divert. Laramie Rivers Co. v. Wheatland Irrigation Dist., 708 P.2d 20,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 572

(Wyo. 1985).

Water right “affected” where contestee's unused water used to fulfill contestant's appropriation. —

A contestant junior downstream reservoir appropriator possessed standing to bring partial abandonment under subsection (b) against a senior reservoir appropriator where the junior undertook to establish that his appropriation was “affected” (as contemplated by subsection (b)) by the senior's failure to apply water for beneficial use for the statutory period of time under facts which showed: (1) that the junior's existing water right had historically been unfulfilled by the stream flow, whether the senior diverted the contested water or not; but (2) that the undiverted flow of contested water has in the past served, and would in the future serve, to more nearly approximate the fulfillment of the reservoir authority of the junior. “Injury” to the contestant's water rights resulted from the ever-present danger and probability that the contestee would one day exercise its prerogative of “resuscitating” its abandoned reservoir water right by reapplication to beneficial use, thereby depriving the contestant's lawful utilization of the abandoned water. Laramie Rivers Co. v. Wheatland Irrigation Dist., 708 P.2d 20,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 572

(Wyo. 1985) (decided under facts existing prior to 1985 amendment).

But not where contestant has used contestee's water in excess of contestant's appropriation. —

The board did not identify a water right of the contestant which would have been abridged by the reapplication, after five years, of the contestee's water to beneficial use, but only said that the contestant established a pattern of use of the contestee's water, in excess of the contestant's appropriation, which would have been interrupted in the event abandonment by the contestee was not declared. Thus, the contestant was not possessed of standing to seek a declaration of abandonment. Board of Land Comm'rs v. Lonesome Fox Corp., 707 P.2d 167,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 577

(Wyo. 1985) (decided under facts existing prior to 1985 amendment).

No standing where effect of abandonment would be to enlarge contestant's appropriation. —

A water user may not bootstrap standing for the purpose of bringing abandonment of his neighbor's water rights when the only effect of the abandonment would be to enlarge the contestant's appropriation as distinguished from protecting his right to use his previously appropriated water. Cremer v. State Bd. of Control, 675 P.2d 250,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 241

(Wyo. 1984) (decided prior to 1985 amendment).

Contestant's burden to establish actual volume of water in contestee's reservoir. —

The contestant bore the burden of establishing the actual volume of water in the contestee' reservoir represented by a certain elevation, which elevation was the limitation set by the state engineer. Proof of such storage volume identified the portion of the contestee's storage rights above that elevation which were subject to a declaration of abandonment. Laramie Rivers Co. v. Wheatland Irrigation Dist., 708 P.2d 20,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 572

(Wyo. 1985).

Evidence insufficient to support board's finding. —

Evidence did not support the board of control's determination of the amount of supplemental water that an irrigation district was diverting in the preceding five-year period where the pumping was not measured in any definitive way. Goshen Irrigation Dist. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Control, 926 P.2d 943,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1996).

Surplus Water Law cannot bestow junior appropriator standing upon base right senior appropriator. —

Since a 1945 surplus water appropriation may not be abandoned for
nonuse without abandoning the water right upon which it depends and
to which it is attached, and since
§

41-4-324

prohibits use of the surplus water provisions to attack
base rights, the Surplus Water Law (§§

41-4-317

through

41-4-324

) may not be used for the purpose of bestowing junior
appropriator standing upon a base right senior appropriator so that
such senior appropriator may establish that he is “affected” within
the purview of this section.
Cremer v. State Bd. of Control, 675 P.2d 250,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 241

(Wyo. 1984) (decided prior to 1985 amendment).

Formal declaration prerequisite to forfeiture of vested rights. —

Before the forfeiture of vested water rights provided for by this section should be construed to be operative, there should be a formal declaration thereof procured by someone clothed by law with proper authority to invoke it. It is quite obvious, too, that until a declaration of forfeiture has been made the owner of the water right still retains the title to it and is justified, of course, in his continued use thereof. Sturgeon v. Brooks, 73 Wyo. 436, 281 P.2d 675,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1955) (decided under prior law).

Until a declaration of forfeiture is obtained pursuant to this section, it is obvious that owner of a water right retains title. Horse Creek Conservation Dist. v. Lincoln Land Co., 54 Wyo. 320, 92 P.2d 572,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1939) (decided under prior law).

Statutory exception. —

An irrigation district's contention that partial abandonment of its supplemental water supply was prohibited by subsection (f) was without merit where it did not have the facilities in place to divert its entire appropriation. Goshen Irrigation Dist. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Control, 926 P.2d 943,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1996).

Implicit repeal not established. —

The legislature did not implicitly repeal this section by making appropriations of two new pumps to an irrigation district, notwithstanding evidence of abandonment. Goshen Irrigation Dist. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Control, 926 P.2d 943,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1996).

Board does not have jurisdiction to consider contractual matters.

Bruegman v. Johnson Ranches, Inc., 520 P.2d 489,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1974).

Applied

in

Wallis v. Luman, 625 P.2d 759,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1981).

Quoted

in

Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 656 P.2d 1144,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1983).

Stated

in

In re Various Water Rights in Lake De Smet Reservoir, 623 P.2d 764,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1981); Wyoming v. United States, 933 F. Supp. 1030, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11526 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Record Title of Water and Ditch Rights,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 200.

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

For case note, “Water Law — The State Engineer's Authority with Reference to Change of Use, Place of Use, Point of Diversion and Means of Conveyance of Water Embraced by Water Permits: Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 59 (1984).

For case note, “Water Law — Statutory Forfeiture of Water Rights in Wyoming: Wheatland Irr. Dist. v. Laramie Rivers Co., 659 P.2d 561,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 93 (1984).

For comment, “Solar Access Rights in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 419 (1984).

For casenote, “Water Law — Standing Requirement Under the Wyoming Forfeiture Statute: Platte County Grazing Association v. State Board of Control, 675 P.2d 1279,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1984),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 485 (1984).

For comment, “The Doctrine of Sovereign Immunity in Wyoming: Current Status of the Doctrine and Arguments for Abrogation,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 221 (1985).

For comment, “Forfeiture Proceedings in Wyoming Water Law: The Legislature Revives Private Standing,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 459 (1985).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

For article, “Waist Deep in the Big Muddy: Property Rights, Public Values and Instream Waters,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1991).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
113.02 (Matthew Bender).

§ 41-3-402.
Initiation by state engineer; hearing; appeal.

When any appropriator has failed, intentionally or unintentionally, to use any portion of surface, underground or reservoir water appropriated by him, whether under an adjudicated or unadjudicated right, for a period of five (5) successive years, the state engineer may initiate forfeiture proceedings against the appropriator with the state board of control, to determine the validity of the unused right. The state engineer shall designate the area to be affected by the proceedings, not to contain in area more than one (1) water division. The total absence of water to divert during an irrigation season precludes the inclusion of any period of nonuse resulting therefrom in the computation of the successive five (5) year period. The secretary of the board shall refer the matter for a hearing to the superintendent of the water division where the forfeiture is alleged to have occurred. This section does not apply to any reservoir for which an extension has been granted during the period of extension under W.S. 41-3-401(a).

The superintendent shall send notices, by certified mail, of the time, place, and purpose of the hearing to all owners of lands covered by the appropriations involved in the forfeiture proceeding. Such persons shall be joined as parties to the forfeiture proceedings as contestees. The state shall be designated as contestant. In a case where notice by certified mail cannot be accomplished, an advertisement published once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the forfeiture is alleged to have occurred, naming the parties in the case and setting forth the time, place, and purpose of the hearing, and a general description of the water rights whose status is under consideration, shall answer the requirements of notice. Notice by certified mail shall first be attempted before notice by advertisement is employed. Advertisement costs shall be paid by the state engineer. In addition, whenever it appears necessary for full and proper notice, the superintendent may post a notice of the hearing in a conspicuous place on the land or at the place where the water rights are attached or utilized, or on the point of diversion.

Any use of a contested water right, easement, privilege, or portion thereof, by the water user, his lessees, agents, transferees or assignees on or after the date of the notice shall be inadmissible as evidence of beneficial use in all hearings or appeals arising out of the alleged forfeiture.

A transcript shall be made of the hearing. The record shall be delivered to the superintendent. The state engineer shall provide and pay for the costs of such record. At the conclusion of the hearing, the transcript, all other evidence, and the report of the superintendent shall be transmitted to the board of control by the superintendent. At its next meeting, the board shall vote by secret written ballot to declare the right in question forfeited or to decline to do so. Any forfeiture requires three (3) affirmative votes by the board.

Whenever the state engineer has initiated forfeiture proceedings, he shall not participate as a voting member of the board of control in any determination of whether any water right, easement, or privilege is to be forfeited, all other laws to the contrary notwithstanding.

Such proceedings shall not be initiated by the state engineer after the use of a water right, easement or privilege has occurred.

Any time within two (2) years after the date the board has entered an order forfeiting a water right, any person who can demonstrate to the satisfaction of the board by written petition, proof, or affidavits, that he was an owner, lessee or beneficiary of the forfeited right, that he had no actual or constructive notice of the forfeiture hearings, and that he has been damaged thereby, may require the board to reopen the case for a determination of whether such right shall remain forfeited or be reactivated without loss of priority.

Whenever the board has declared any water right forfeited, it shall send a certified copy of the declaration to each contestee within sixty (60) days. Such party may within thirty (30) days after the date of mailing, appeal to the district court of the district wherein the hearing was originally held or in the district court of Laramie county.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow the state engineer to initiate forfeiture proceedings against water rights which are being put to beneficial use, wholly or in part.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-47.2; Laws 1977, ch. 126, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Abandonment not shown. —

Owner's predecessor-in-interest waived any right he had to water under a canal permit when, in order to obtain a ditch enlargement permit, the predecessor submitted an affidavit requesting a canal permit be cancelled; that decision was made final when a ditch enlargement certificate of appropriation was issued in 1922. Abandonment was not shown because there was no formal abandonment or forfeiture procedure, as contemplated by prior and current law. General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River Sys. & All Other Sources v. State, 2015 WY 104, 355 P.3d 1222,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2015).

Beneficial use deemed continuing obligation. —

Beneficial use is not a concept which is considered only at the time an appropriation is obtained. The concept represents a continuing obligation which must be satisfied in order for the appropriation to remain viable. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. State Bd. of Control, 578 P.2d 557,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1978).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

For case note, “Water Law — The State Engineer's Authority with Reference to Change of Use, Place of Use, Point of Diversion and Means of Conveyance of Water Embraced by Water Permits: Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 59 (1984).

For case note, “Water Law — Statutory Forfeiture of Water Rights in Wyoming: Wheatland Irr. Dist. v. Laramie Rivers Co., 659 P.2d 561,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 93 (1984).

For comment, “Solar Access Rights in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 419 (1984).

For casenote, “Water Law — Standing Requirement Under the Wyoming Forfeiture Statute: Platte County Grazing Association v. State Board of Control, 675 P.2d 1279,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1984),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 485 (1984).

For comment, “Forfeiture Proceedings in Wyoming Water Law: The Legislature Revives Private Standing,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 459 (1985).

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).